Washington statutes.
RCW 39.28.040

Loans and grants to finance preliminary public works expenditures.

The state of Washington, its various counties, municipal corporations, quasi municipal corporations, cities, towns, villages and all other political subdivisions of the state are hereby authorized to accept from the federal government all loans, advances, grants in aid, or donations that may be made available by any federal agency for the purpose of financing the cost of architectural, engineering, and economic investigations and studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other acts preliminary to the construction of public works.

[ 1971 c 76 s 5; 1945 c 106 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-45.]